Illinois, session 104th, HB1011.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Veterans' Employment Representative Act is 5amended by changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (330 ILCS 50/3)  (from Ch. 48, par. 186c)7    Sec. 3. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Veterans' Employment Representative Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)